Utah statutes.
53-11-113.   Bail recovery agent and bail recovery apprentice licensure --
Liability insurance -- Fee -- Workers' compensation.
(1)  An applicant for licensure as a bail recovery agent or as a bail recovery
apprentice shall provide as part of the application:
(a)  the full name and address of the applicant;
(b)  two passport-size color photographs of the applicant;
(c)  the name of the bail bond recovery agency for which the applicant will be
an employee or with which the applicant will be an independent contractor;
(d)  written indication by a bail bond recovery agency or its designee that it
intends to employ or contract with the applicant; and
(e)  a notarized statement of the applicant's experience and qualifications
required under Section 53-11-111 or 53-11-112, as appropriate.
(2)  The licensure application or renewal shall be accompanied by the fee
required under Section 53-11-115.
(3) (a)  A license or a license renewal for a bail recovery agent or a bail
recovery apprentice may not be granted to an applicant unless the employing
bail bond recovery agency has on file with the department evidence of current
workers' compensation coverage.
(b)  A bail recovery agent or bail recovery apprentice license may not be
reinstated without providing verification of the reinstatement of the workers'
compensation coverage and payment of the reinstatement fee required in Section
53-11-115.
(c)  The provisions of this Subsection (3) do not apply to a bail recovery
agent or bail recovery apprentice who is working for a bail bond recovery
agency as an independent contractor.
